Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,141
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

(a) The district court may dissolve a corporation:

(1) In a proceeding by the Attorney General if it is established that:

(i) The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud;

(ii) The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

(iii) The corporation is a public benefit corporation and the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

(iv) The corporation is a public benefit corporation and is no longer able to carry out its purposes;

(2) Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation, in a proceeding by fifty members or members holding five percent of the voting power, whichever is less, or by a director or any person specified in the articles, if it is established that:

(i) The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, and the members, if any, are unable to breach the deadlock;

(ii) The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

(iii) The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have, or would otherwise have, expired;

(iv) The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

(v) The corporation is a public benefit or religious corporation and is no longer able to carry out its purposes;

(3) In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

(i) The creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied, and the corporation is insolvent; or

(ii) The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor's claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent; or

(4) In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

(b) Prior to dissolving a corporation, the district court shall consider whether:

(1) There are reasonable alternatives to dissolution;

(2) Dissolution is in the public interest, if the corporation is a public benefit corporation; and

(3) Dissolution is the best way of protecting the interests of members if the corporation is a mutual benefit corporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 141.